Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1319
Receipt of written notice, defined.

For purposes of section 1324 of the Food Security Act of 1985, Public Law 99-198, receipt of written notice shall mean the date the notice is actually received by a buyer in the ordinary course of business or the first date upon which delivery is attempted by a carrier. A buyer in the ordinary course of business shall act in good faith. In all cases a buyer in the ordinary course of business shall be presumed to have received the notice ten days after it was mailed.

Laws 1986, Third Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 19.